New York, session 2025-2026, S9930.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "Sacred Burial Law".
§ 2. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 4211-a
to read as follows:
§ 4211-a. Cadavers; unclaimed; delivery to religious organizations. 1.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section forty-two hundred eleven of
this title, and prior to the disposition of a body pursuant to such
section, if the body of a deceased person is not claimed as provided in
section forty-two hundred two of this article and such person is known
to have been of Jewish descent or of Muslim descent, the director or
person in charge of any hospital, institution, morgue or other place for
bodies of deceased persons not interred or otherwise finally disposed
of, and every funeral director, undertaker or other person having in
their lawful possession, any body of a deceased person for keeping
or burial, shall contact: (a) for persons of Jewish descent: (i)
Misaskim, 5805 16th Ave, Brooklyn, NY 11204, (718) 854-4548; (ii) Chesed
Shel Emes, 1224 52nd St, Brooklyn, NY 11219, (855) 273-2121; and/or
(iii) Hebrew Free Burial Association, Inc. 330 7th Avenue, 10th Floor
New York, NY 10001, (212) 239-1664; or (b) for persons of Muslim
descent: Janazah Community Funeral Services, 5306 3rd Ave, Brooklyn, NY
11220, (646) 427-3885, or any successor organizations, and inquire if
the organization is willing to pay for the burial expense of the
deceased person, and, if the organization is willing to do so, deliver
the body of the deceased person in their possession, charge, custody or
control not placed therein by any person, agency or organization for
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD15576-04-6

S. 9930--A 2
keeping, burial or other lawful disposition to the agreeing organiza-
tion.
2. No unclaimed human remains shall be buried, cremated, or otherwise
finally disposed of unless such remains have first been entered into the
National Missing and Unidentified Persons System, or any successor data-
base, in accordance with applicable procedures.
3. The provisions of this section shall not supersede any prior writ-
ten directives of the deceased person regarding anatomical gifts pursu-
ant to article forty-three of this chapter.
§ 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall
have become a law.